District of Columbia statutes.
31-3154

Regulations.

The Commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter, including provisions for the disposal of books of business.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-328, § 5, 52 DCR 1459